Utah statutes.
34-41-103.   Policy requirements.
(1) (a)  Before testing or retesting for the presence of drugs, a local
governmental entity or state institution of higher education shall:
(i)  adopt a written policy or ordinance;
(ii)  distribute it to employees and volunteers; and
(iii)  make it available for review by prospective employees and prospective
volunteers.
(b)  The local governmental entity or state institution of higher education
may only test or retest for the presence of drugs by following the procedures
and requirements of that ordinance or policy.
(2)  The collection and testing of samples shall be conducted in accordance
with Section 34-41-104 and not necessarily limited to circumstances where
there are indications of individual, job-related impairment of an employee or
volunteer.
(3)  The use and disposition of all drug test results are subject to the
limitations of Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management
Act, and Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. 12101 through
12213.
(4)  An employee, prospective employee, volunteer, or prospective volunteer
shall submit a split urine sample for testing or retesting.
(5)  A split urine sample shall consist of  at least 45 ml of urine.  The
urine shall be divided into two specimen bottles, with at least 30 ml of urine
in one bottle and at least 15 ml of urine in the other.  If the test results
of the 30 ml urine sample indicate the presence of drugs, the donor of the
test shall have 72 hours from the time the donor is so notified to request, at
the donor's option that the 15 ml urine sample be tested for the indicated
drugs, the expense of which shall be divided equally between the donor and
employer.  In addition to the test results of the 30 ml urine sample, the test
results of the 15 ml urine sample shall be considered at any subsequent
disciplinary hearing if the requirements of this section and Section 34-41-104
have been complied with in the collection, handling, and testing of these
samples.
